New York, session 2025-2026, A10660.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of section 54.50 of the local finance 2 law, as amended by chapter 135 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 To facilitate the marketing of any issue of serial bonds or notes of 5 the county of Erie issued on or before June thirtieth, two thousand 6 [twenty-six] twenty-seven such county may, notwithstanding any limita- 7 tions on private sales of bonds provided by law, and subject to approval 8 by the state comptroller of the terms and conditions of such sale: 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03009-02-6